Maryland, session 2025, SB0746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
22–102.
This title applies only in Harford County.
22–1607.
(A) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
Board may issue a maximum number of nine Class B licenses to the same person.
(B) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE ONE CLASS GSF (GOLF SIMULATOR
FACILITY) LICENSE UNDER § 22–1003.2 OF THIS TITLE TO THE HOLDER OF ONE OR
MORE CLASS B LICENSES.
– 1 –

Ch. 792 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A CLASS GSF (GOLF SIMULATOR FACILITY) LICENSE ISSUED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE INCLUDED IN THE TOTAL
NUMBER OF LICENSES THAT MAY BE ISSUED TO THE SAME PERSON UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –